South Dakota, session 2026, HB1203.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 32-5:
A resident of this state who is an active member of a volunteer fire department
may apply to the Department of Revenue for an exemption from license fees applicable
to any noncommercial automobile, pickup truck, or van licensed in this state pursuant to
§ 32-5-6.
To qualify for the exemption, the resident must submit with the application for
registration a certification from the chief of the fire department to which the resident is
attached, confirming that the resident is an active volunteer member of the fire
department.
The county treasurer shall record any exemption approved under this section and
shall provide the information to the Department of Revenue.
A qualifying applicant may obtain the exemption for one motor vehicle.
The exemption may be renewed annually.
Nothing in this section exempts a person from paying the excise tax required in
§ 32-5B-1 on the purchase price of any motor vehicle.
The exemption provided for in this section does not include the additional cost of
any specialty plate provided for in chapter 32-5.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.